Utah statutes.
63M-1-2611.   Advisory committee.
(1)  The director may appoint an advisory committee comprised of:
(a)  representatives of:
(i)  the affected department for the proposal;
(ii)  a directly affected state entity or school district;
(iii)  the Department of Human Resource Management; and
(iv)  the Division of Risk Management;
(b)  members of the public; and
(c)  other members.
(2)  A member of an advisory committee may not receive compensation or
benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel
expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(3)  An advisory committee appointed in accordance with Subsection (1) may not
participate in the final decision-making of the committee or the board.
(4)  The staff, any outside consultant, and any advisory subcommittee shall:
(a)  provide the committee and the board with professional services, including
architectural, engineering, legal, and financial services, to develop rules
and guidelines to implement the program described in this part; and
(b)  assist the committee and the board in:
(i)  reviewing and commenting on initial proposals;
(ii)  reviewing and commenting on detailed proposals; and
(iii)  preparing and negotiating the terms of any project agreement.
